Utah statutes.
78B-6-1103.   Manufacturing facility in operation over three years --
Limited application of restrictions.
(1)  Notwithstanding Sections 76-10-803 and 78B-6-1101, a manufacturing
facility or operation may not be or become a nuisance, private or public, by
virtue of any changed conditions in and about its location after it has been
in operation for more than three years if the manufacturing facility or
operation was not a nuisance at the time it began operation.  The
manufacturing facility may not increase the condition asserted to be a
nuisance.  The provisions of this Subsection (1) do not apply if a nuisance
results from the negligent or improper operation of a manufacturing facility.
(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) may not affect or defeat the right of
any person to recover damages for any injuries or damage sustained because of
any pollution of, or change in the condition of, the waters of any stream or
the overflow of the lands of any person.
(3)  Any and all ordinances now or hereafter adopted by any county or
municipal corporation in which such manufacturing facility is located, which
makes the operation thereof a nuisance or providing for an abatement thereof
as a nuisance in the circumstances set forth in this section are null and
void; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not
apply whenever a nuisance results from the negligent or improper operation of
any such manufacturing facility.
